Alabama, session 2026rs, HB460.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. The following amendment to the Constitution
of Alabama of 2022, is proposed:
PROPOSED AMENDMENT
(a) In Henry County, an individual 65 years of age or
older may claim a senior property tax assessment for ad
valorem tax purposes on real property located in the county
which is owned by the individual, classified as single-family
owner-occupied residential property, and used and assessed as
the principal place of residence of the individual for not
less than 10 years immediately prior to the tax year for which
the individual first claims the senior property tax
assessment. The senior property tax assessment shall freeze
the assessed value of the property for the year immediately
prior to claiming the assessment.
(b) The following provisions shall apply to the
individual claiming the senior property tax assessment:
(1) The taxpayer shall continue to receive the senior
property tax assessment as long as the taxpayer continues to
use the property as his or her principal place of residence.
(2) The individual shall continue to be eligible to
Page 1

(2) The individual shall continue to be eligible to
HB460 Enrolled
claim a homestead exemption and any other exemption authorized
by law on the property.
(3) The property shall continue to be subject to any
millage rate changes on the property.
(4) The assessed value of any additions to the property
after claiming the senior property tax assessment shall be
added to the assessed value of the property and subject to ad
valorem tax based on the increase in the assessed value of the
addition after the taxpayer claims the senior property tax
assessment.
(5) This assessment may be claimed beginning October 1,
2027.
(6) This assessment must be claimed in writing with the
Henry County Revenue Commissioner between October 1 and
December 31.
Upon ratification of this constitutional amendment, the
Code Commissioner shall number and place this amendment as
appropriate in the constitution omitting this instructional
paragraph and may make the following nonsubstantive revisions:
change capitalization, hierarchy, spelling, and punctuation
for purposes of style and uniformity; correct manifest
grammatical, clerical, and typographical errors; revise
internal or external citations and cross-references; harmonize
language; and translate effective dates.
END PROPOSED AMENDMENT
Section 2. An election upon the proposed amendment
shall be held in accordance with Sections 284, 284.01, and 285
of the Constitution of Alabama of 2022, and the election laws
Page 2

of the Constitution of Alabama of 2022, and the election laws
HB460 Enrolled
of this state. The appropriate election official shall assign
a ballot number for the proposed constitutional amendment on
the election ballot and shall set forth the following
description of the substance or subject matter of the proposed
constitutional amendment:
"Relating to Henry County, proposing an amendment to
the Constitution of Alabama of 2022, to authorize a qualified
taxpayer 65 years of age or older to claim a senior property
tax assessment for real property under certain conditions.
Proposed by Act ____."
This description shall be followed by the following
language:
"Yes( ) No( )."
Section 3. The proposed amendment shall become valid as
part of the Constitution of Alabama of 2022, when approved by
a majority of the qualified electors voting thereon.
Page 3

a majority of the qualified electors voting thereon.
HB460 Enrolled









________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Representatives



________________________________________________
President and Presiding Officer of the Senate


House of Representatives

I hereby certify that the within Act originated in and
was passed by the House 24-Feb-26.

John Treadwell
Clerk


100
101
102
103 Senate 26-Feb-26 Passed
104
105
106
Page 4